en: lamb chop fillet
hr: file od janjećeg kotleta
it: filetto di costoletta di agnello

en: Pan-fried lamb chop fillet
fr: Côte de filet d'agneau poêlée
hr: filet janjećeg kotleta na tavi

en: Grilled lamb chop fillet
fr: Côte de filet d'agneau grillée
hr: file janjećeg kotleta na žaru
it: filetto di costoletta di agnello alla griglia

en: lamb saddle
fr: Selle d'agneau
hr: janjeće sedlo
it: sella di agnello

en: Grilled lamb saddle
fr: Selle d'agneau partie maigre grillée
hr: jagnjeće sedlo na žaru
it: sella di agnello alla griglia

en: Pan-fried lamb saddle
fr: Selle d'agneau partie maigre poêlée
hr: jagnjeće samar u tavi

en: Baked lean lamb saddle
fr: Selle d'agneau partie maigre cuite au four
hr: pečena nemasna janjeća samara
it: sella di agnello magra al forno

en: Roasted lean lamb saddle
fr: Selle d'agneau partie maigre rôtie
hr: pečeno nemasno janjeće samar
it: sella di agnello magra arrosto

en: lamb intestine
da: lammetarm

en: rabbit
ak: Adanko
am: ጥንቸል
ar: أرنب
as: শহাপহু
ay: Wank'u
az: Adadovşanı
be: Трусы
bg: заек
bn: খরগোশ
bs: Kunić
ca: conill
ce: Пашбукъ
cs: králík
cv: Кролик
cy: Cwningen
da: kanin
de: Kaninchen
el: Κουνέλι
eo: kuniklo
es: conejo
et: Küülik
eu: Untxi
fa: خرگوش
fi: kaniini
fo: Kanin
fr: lapin
fy: knyn
ga: Coinín
gd: Coineanach
gl: Coello
gn: Apere'arusu
gu: સસલું
ha: Zomo
he: ארנבים
hi: खरगोश
hr: kunić
ht: Lapen
hu: nyúl
hy: ճագար
ia: Conilio
id: Kelinci
io: kuniklo
is: Kanínur
it: coniglio
iu: ᐅᑲᓕᐊᑦᓯᐊᖅ
ja: ウサギ
jv: Kelinci
ka: ბოცვერი
kn: ಮೊಲ
ko: 래빗
ku: Xerûşk
la: Cuniculus
lt: Triušiai
lv: Truši
mk: зајак
ml: മുയൽ
mr: ससा
ms: Arnab
mt: fenek
my: ယုန်
nb: kanin
ne: खरायो
nl: konijn
nn: kanin
nv: Gah
or: ଠେକୁଆ
pa: ਖਰਗੋਸ਼
pl: królik
pt: coelho
qu: Kunu
ro: Iepure
ru: кролики
sa: शशः
sh: Kunić
si: හාවා
sn: Tsuro
so: Bakeyle
sq: lepur
sr: кунић
su: Kelenci
sv: Kaniner
ta: முயல்
te: కుందేలు
th: กระต่าย
tl: Kuneho
tr: Ada tavşanı
uk: Кролі
ur: خرگوش
uz: Quyon
vi: thỏ
vo: krolig
wa: Robete
yi: קיניגל
za: Douq
zh: 兔

en: rabbit meat
bg: заешко месо, заешко, месо от заек
ca: carn de conill
cs: králičí maso
de: Hasenfleisch, Kaninchenfleisch
eo: kuniklaĵo
es: Carne de conejo
fi: kaninliha
fr: viande de lapin
hr: zečje meso
hu: nyúlhús
id: Daging kelinci
it: carne di coniglio
ko: 토끼고기
nl: konijnenvlees
ru: крольчатина
uk: Кролятина
vi: Thịt thỏ
zh: 兔肉

en: rabbit liver
ca: fetge de conill
de: Kaninchenleber
es: hígado de conejo
fr: foie de lapin
hr: zečja jetra
it: fegato di coniglio
nl: konijnenlever
ru: крольчатина печень
uk: кроляча печінка

en: sheep
af: Skaap
ak: Odwan
am: በግ
ar: خروف
as: ভেড়া
av: Чахъу
ay: Iwija
ba: Һарыҡ
be: авечка
bg: овца
bm: Saga
bn: ভেড়া
bo: ལུག
br: Dañvad
bs: Ovca
ca: Ovella
ce: Ústaģ
cs: ovce
cv: Сурăх
cy: Dafad
da: får
de: Schaf, Hausschaf
el: πρόβατο
eo: ŝafo
es: oveja
et: lammas
eu: ardi
fa: گوسفند
fi: lammas
fo: Seyður
fr: mouton, brebis
ga: Caora
gd: Caora
gl: Ovella
gn: Ovecha
gv: Keyrrey
he: כבש הבית
hi: भेड़
hr: domaća ovca
ht: Mouton
hu: juh, birka
hy: ոչխար
id: Domba
io: Mutono
is: Sauðfé
it: pecora
ja: ヒツジ
jv: Wedhus gembel
kg: Dimeme
kk: Қой
kn: ಕುರಿ
ko: 양
ks: کَٹھ
ku: Mih
ky: Кой
la: ovis aries
lb: Schof
li: Sjaop
ln: Mpatá
lt: Avis
lv: aita
mk: овца
ml: ചെമ്മരിയാട്
mn: Хонь
mr: मेंढी
ms: Biri-biri
mt: Nagħġa
my: သိုး
nb: tamsau
ne: भेडा
nl: schaap
nn: sau
nv: Dibé
or: ମେଣ୍ଢା
os: Фыс
pa: ਭੇਡ
pl: owca, owca domowa
pt: ovelha
qu: Uwiha
ro: Oaie domestică
ru: овца
sd: رڍ
se: Sávza
sg: Walitaba
sh: Ovca
si: බැටළුවා
sk: Ovca domáca
sl: Domača ovca
sm: Mamoe
sn: Hwayi
so: Ido
sq: Delja
sr: овца
su: Domba
sv: tamfår
sw: Kondoo-kaya
ta: வளர்ப்புச் செம்மறியாடு
te: గొర్రె
tg: Гӯсфанд
th: แกะ
tl: Tupa
tr: koyun
uk: вівця
ur: بھیڑ
uz: Qoʻy
vi: Cừu nhà
vo: Lammas
wa: Bedots
xh: Yegusha
yi: שאף
yo: Àgùtàn
zh: 羊
zu: imvu

en: mutton, sheeps meat
af: skaapvleis
az: Qoyun əti
be: бараніна
ca: carn d'ovella
cs: skopové maso
cy: Cig oen
de: Schaffleisch
es: carne de oveja
fi: lampaanliha
fr: viande de mouton, viande d'ovin, viande ovine
hr: ovčetina
hu: birkahús, juhhús
id: Daging domba
it: carne ovina
la: Vervecina
nb: fårekjøtt
nl: schaapsvlees, schapenvlees
ru: баранятина
sv: fårkött
tr: Koyun eti
uk: баранина

en: sheeps casing, Sheep gut, mutton casing
de: Schafsdarm, Schafsaitling
es: Tripa de oveja
fi: Lampaansuoli
fr: boyau de mouton
hr: ovčje crijevo
hu: juhbél, birkabél
it: budello di pecore, budello di sale
pl: jelito baranie

en: natural sheep casing
es: tripa de oveja natural
fr: boyau naturel de mouton
hr: prirodno ovčje crijevo
it: budello di pecora naturale
pl: naturalne jelito baranie

en: Mutton leg
fr: Gigot de mouton
hr: ovčji but
it: coscia di montone

en: game animal
de: Wildtier
fi: riistaeläin, riista
fr: Gibier
hr: lovna životinja
hu: vad
it: Selvaggina
pl: dziczyzna

en: deer
bg: елен
da: hjort
de: Hirsch, Reh
fi: hirvieläin
fr: biche
hr: jelen
hu: szarvas
it: Cervo
pl: jeleń, jelenia

en: venison, deer meat
ar: لحم الغزال
bg: еленско месо
ca: carn de cérvol
cs: zvěřina
cy: cig carw
da: hjortekød
de: Hirschfleisch
es: Carne de venado
fa: گوشت گوزن
fi: hirvieläinten liha
fr: viande de cerf, viande de chevreuil
ga: fiafheoil
gv: feill feeaih
hr: divljač
hu: szarvashús
id: Daging rusa
it: carne di cervo
ja: 鹿肉
ko: 사슴고기
lt: Elniena
mk: срнечко месо
nl: hertevlees
pa: ਵੈਨਿਸਨ
pl: mięso z jelenia, mięso z jeleniowatych
ru: оленина
uk: оленятина
vi: Thịt nai
zh: 鹿肉